Indiana, session 2026, HB1407.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-32.3-1-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This article applies only to a qualified
organization.
(b) This article applies only to the following approved gambling
activities conducted as fundraising activities by qualified organizations:
(1) Bingo events, casino game nights, raffles, festivals, contest
based raffles, and other gaming activities approved by the
commission.
(2) The sale of pull tabs, punchboards, and tip boards:
(A) at bingo events, casino game nights, raffles, contest based
raffles, and festivals conducted by qualified organizations; or
(B) at any time on the premises owned or leased by qualified
organizations and regularly used for the activities of qualified
organizations.
This article does not apply to any other sale of pull tabs,
punchboards, and tip boards.
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


(c) This article does not apply to a promotion offer subject to
IC 24-8.
(d) This article does not apply to the following:
(1) A type II gambling game authorized by IC 4-36.
(2) A raffle or other gambling game authorized by IC 4-36-5-1(b).
(e) This article does not apply to a prize linked savings program
that:
(1) is offered or conducted by an eligible financial institution
under IC 28-1-23.2;
(2) is:
(A) offered or conducted by a credit union organized or
reorganized under United States law; and
(B) conducted in the same manner as a prize linked savings
program under IC 28-1-23.2; or
(3) is:
(A) offered or conducted by an insured depository institution
(as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813) that is:
(i) a national bank formed under 12 U.S.C. 21;
(ii) a state member bank (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
(iii) a state nonmember bank (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
or
(iv) a savings association (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
and
(B) conducted in the same manner as a prize linked savings
program under IC 28-1-23.2.
SECTION 2. IC 4-32.3-1-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A bingo event, casino game night, raffle,
contest based raffle, festival, or other charity gambling activity is not
allowed in Indiana unless it is conducted by a qualified organization in
accordance with this article.
SECTION 3. IC 4-32.3-1-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Local governmental authority concerning
the following is preempted by the state under this article and IC 4-30:
(1) All matters relating to the operation of bingo events, casino
game nights, contest based raffles, or raffles.
(2) All matters relating to the possession, transportation,
advertising, sale, manufacture, printing, storing, or distribution of
pull tabs, punchboards, or tip boards.
(b) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state
may not enact an ordinance relating to the commission's operations
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


authorized by this article.
SECTION 4. IC 4-32.3-2-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. "Allowable event" means:
(1) a bingo event;
(2) a casino game night;
(3) a raffle;
(4) a festival;
(5) a sale of pull tabs, punchboards, or tip boards; or
(6) a gambling activity under IC 4-32.3-4-11; or
(7) a contest based raffle;
conducted by a qualified organization in accordance with this article
and rules adopted by the commission under this article.
SECTION 5. IC 4-32.3-2-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. "Contest based raffle"
means the selling of tickets or chances to win a raffle prize in which
the winners of the raffle prize are determined by result of a specific
event or contest, including a sport horse competition, in the
manner described in IC 4-32.3-5-25.
SECTION 6. IC 4-32.3-2-34.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 34.5. "Sport horse competition"
means a gaming event with not more than twelve (12):
(1) Indiana bred thoroughbred, standardbred, or quarter
horses participating in a sporting activity including:
(A) racing; and
(B) harness racing; or
(2) retired American quarter and thoroughbred horses
participating in a jumping event;
that occurs at a local event, a county fair, or the state fair.
SECTION 7. IC 4-32.3-2-39, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. "Volunteer ticket agent" means a person
acting on behalf of a qualified organization that:
(1) receives no compensation from the qualified organization;
(2) sells tickets at a raffle or contest based raffle licensed under
IC 4-32.3-4-6, a festival under IC 4-32.3-4-7, or a gambling
activity under IC 4-32.3-4-11; and
(3) does not assist the qualified organization in conducting the
allowable activity in any other way.
SECTION 8. IC 4-32.3-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2025,
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The commission may issue an annual
activity license to a qualified organization if the qualified organization:
(1) meets the requirements of this section;
(2) submits an application; and
(3) pays a fee set by the commission under IC 4-32.3-6.
(b) The following information must be included in an annual
activity license:
(1) Whether the qualified organization is authorized to conduct
bingo, pull tabs, punchboards, tip boards, contest based raffles,
or raffle activities on more than one (1) occasion during a one (1)
year period.
(2) The location of the allowable activities.
(3) The expiration date of the license.
(c) A qualified organization may conduct casino game night
activities under an annual activity license if the requirements of
subsections (a) and (b) are met, and:
(1) the organization is a qualified veteran organization or fraternal
organization; and
(2) the annual activity license requires that a facility or location
may not be used for purposes of conducting an annual casino
game night activity on more than three (3) calendar days per
calendar week regardless of the number of qualified organizations
conducting annual casino night activities at the facility or
location.
(d) An annual activity license may be reissued annually upon the
submission of an application for reissuance on a form prescribed by the
commission after the qualified organization has paid the fee under
IC 4-32.3-6.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2026, a facility or location may not be used
for the purpose of conducting a bingo event or a casino game night on
more than three (3) calendar days per calendar week, regardless of the
number of qualified organizations conducting allowable events at the
facility or location.
SECTION 9. IC 4-32.3-4-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The commission may issue a single activity
license to a qualified organization if the qualified organization:
(1) submits an application; and
(2) pays the required fees under IC 4-32.3-6.
(b) A single activity license:
(1) may authorize:
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


(A) bingo;
(B) a casino game night; or
(C) a raffle; or
(D) a contest based raffle;
at one (1) specific time and location;
(2) must state the:
(A) date;
(B) beginning times; and
(C) ending times;
of the authorized single activity; and
(3) may authorize a qualified organization to sell pull tabs,
punchboards, and tip boards.
SECTION 10. IC 4-32.3-4-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The commission may issue a festival license
to a qualified organization if the qualified organization:
(1) submits an application; and
(2) pays the required fees under IC 4-32.3-6.
(b) The license may authorize the qualified organization:
(1) to conduct:
(A) bingo events;
(B) casino game nights;
(C) raffles; and
(D) contest based raffles; and
(D) (E) gambling activities licensed under section 11 of this
chapter; and
(2) to sell:
(A) pull tabs;
(B) punchboards; and
(C) tip boards.
(c) The license must state the location and the dates the activities
may be conducted.
(d) A festival cannot exceed five (5) consecutive days.
(e) A qualified organization may apply for up to three (3) festival
licenses each calendar year.
(f) Festival licenses may not be used consecutively.
SECTION 11. IC 4-32.3-4-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Only a:
(1) bona fide national organization; and
(2) bona fide national foundation;
may apply for an annual affiliate license under this section.
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


(b) The commission may issue an annual affiliate license to a
qualified organization described in subsection (a) if the qualified
organization:
(1) submits an application; and
(2) pays the required fees under IC 4-32.3-6.
(c) The application must include the information the commission
requires, including the following:
(1) The name and address of the organization.
(2) The names and addresses of the officers of the organization.
(3) The mailing address of each Indiana affiliate of the
organization.
(4) An estimate of the number and approximate locations of the
bingo events, and raffles, and contest based raffles the
organization's Indiana affiliates plan to conduct.
(5) The name of each proposed operator and sufficient facts
relating to the proposed operator to enable the commission to
determine whether the proposed operator is qualified.
(6) A sworn statement signed by the presiding officer and
secretary of the organization attesting to the eligibility of the
organization for a license, including the nonprofit character of the
organization.
(d) An annual affiliate license:
(1) may authorize a qualified organization to conduct:
(A) bingo events; and
(B) raffles; and
(C) contest based raffles;
through the organization's Indiana affiliates on more than one (1)
occasion during a one (1) year period;
(2) must state the expiration date of the license; and
(3) may be reissued annually upon the submission of an
application for reissuance on a form prescribed by the
commission after the qualified organization has paid the fee under
IC 4-32.3-6.
(e) An Indiana affiliate of the qualified organization may not
conduct an activity under an annual affiliate license until the affiliate
has been in existence in Indiana for at least sixty (60) days.
(f) The following limitations apply to a qualified organization
holding an annual affiliate license:
(1) The qualified organization may not conduct more than ten
(10) activities under the annual affiliate license per week through
any combination of its Indiana affiliates.
(2) The qualified organization or the Indiana affiliate of a
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


qualified organization, except the Indiana affiliates that decline
affiliate status, may not hold a single activity license for bingo, or
a raffle, or a contest based raffle.
(g) A qualified organization conducting a bingo event, or raffle, or
contest based raffle shall provide notice to the commission at least
twenty-one (21) days before the day of the allowable activity. Raffle
tickets and contest based raffle tickets may not be sold before
providing notice to the commission. The notice provided under this
section must be on a form prescribed by the commission.
SECTION 12. IC 4-32.3-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2021,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) This section applies to a gambling activity
other than a bingo event, casino game night, festival, pull tabs,
punchboards, tip boards, or raffle, or contest based raffle.
(b) The commission may issue a single activity license or an annual
activity license to conduct a gambling activity approved by the
commission to a qualified organization upon the organization's
submission of an application and payment of applicable fees under
IC 4-32.3-6.
(c) A single activity license may:
(1) authorize the qualified organization to conduct the gambling
event at only one (1) time and location; and
(2) state the date, beginning and ending times, and location of the
gambling event.
(d) An annual activity license:
(1) may authorize the qualified organization to conduct the
activity on more than one (1) occasion during a period of one (1)
year;
(2) must state the locations of the permitted activities;
(3) must state the expiration date of the license; and
(4) may be reissued annually upon the submission of an
application for reissuance on the form prescribed by the
commission and upon the qualified organization's payment of the
applicable fees under IC 4-32.3-6.
(e) The commission may impose any condition upon a qualified
organization that is issued a license to conduct a gambling activity
under this section.
SECTION 13. IC 4-32.3-4-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Except for raffles, contest based raffles,
pull tabs, punchboards, and tip boards conducted under an annual
activity license, raffles, and contest based raffles conducted under an
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


annual affiliate license, or an allowable activity conducted under a
festival license, a qualified organization may not conduct more than
three (3) allowable activities during a calendar week and not more than
one (1) allowable activity each day.
(b) Not more than one (1) qualified organization may conduct an
allowable event on the same day at the same location.
SECTION 14. IC 4-32.3-4-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.188-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) This section applies only to a qualified
organization that is a bona fide veterans organization.
(b) The commission may issue a three (3) year charity gaming
license, for any license issued under this chapter, to a qualified
organization if:
(1) the provisions of this section are satisfied; and
(2) for each license held by the qualified organization, the
organization:
(A) submits a report to the commission that includes:
(i) information described in section 15(b)(1) through
15(b)(7) of this chapter;
(ii) a financial report; and
(iii) a gross receipts report; and
(B) pays the applicable fees under IC 4-32.3-6-3.
(c) A license issued under this section authorizes a qualified
organization to conduct any of the following allowable events:
(1) A bingo event.
(2) A casino game night.
(3) A raffle.
(4) A festival.
(5) A sale of pull tabs, punchboards, or tip boards.
(6) A contest based raffle.
(6) (7) Other gambling activities authorized under section 11 of
this chapter.
(d) A license issued under this section:
(1) must state the expiration date of the license; and
(2) may be reissued after the expiration of the three (3) year
period upon the submission of an application for reissuance on the
form established by the commission and upon the licensee's
payment of a fee in the amount set by IC 4-32.3-6-7.5.
SECTION 15. IC 4-32.3-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A qualified organization shall maintain and
submit to the commission accurate records of all financial aspects of an
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


allowable event as set forth in rules adopted by the commission under
IC 4-22-2. A qualified organization shall make accurate reports of all
financial aspects of an allowable activity to the commission within the
time established by the commission as set forth in rules adopted by the
commission under IC 4-22-2.
(b) Except for a candidate's committee, a convention license, and an
exempt event, a qualified organization shall deposit funds received
from an allowable activity in a separate and segregated account set up
for that purpose.
(c) A qualified organization conducting a bingo event, or raffle, or
contest based raffle under an annual affiliate license shall deposit the
funds received from each activity conducted by its separate Indiana
affiliates into a single account maintained by a financial institution
physically located in Indiana. All expenses of the qualified organization
with respect to an allowable activity shall be paid from the separate
account.
(d) The commission may require a qualified organization to submit
any records maintained under this section for an independent audit by
a certified public accountant selected by the commission. A qualified
organization must bear the cost of any audit required under this section.
(e) A bona fide veterans organization holding a three (3) year
charity gaming license issued under IC 4-32.3-4-16 must submit the
following to the commission before the annual anniversary date of the
issuance of the three (3) year charity gaming license:
(1) An event summary for each allowable event conducted under
the license.
(2) An annual financial report.
(3) An annual gross receipts report.
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (d), a qualified organization that:
(1) conducts casino game night activities; and
(2) has an adjusted gross revenue with annual gross receipts of
over one million dollars ($1,000,000) from casino game night
activities for the purpose of the license fee assessed under
IC 4-32.3-6-7 or IC 4-32.3-6-7.5;
shall submit any records maintained under this section related to the
year described in subdivision (2) for an independent audit by a certified
public accountant selected by the qualified organization. A qualified
organization shall submit the results of the independent audit to the
commission not later than ninety (90) days after the qualified
organization pays the license fee assessed under IC 4-32.3-6-7 or
IC 4-32.3-6-7.5 as part of the qualified organization's application for
renewal. The commission and a qualified organization may agree on an
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


extension to the deadline to submit the independent audit.
SECTION 16. IC 4-32.3-5-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) For each allowable activity conducted under
this article, a qualified organization shall designate an individual to
serve as the operator of the allowable activity. An individual designated
under this section:
(1) must be qualified to serve as an operator under this article;
and
(2) in the case of a qualified organization holding an annual
affiliate license, must be a member of the Indiana affiliate
conducting the particular activity.
(b) A qualified organization holding an annual affiliate license may
do the following:
(1) Designate an individual qualified under subsection (a)(2) to
serve as the operator of raffles or contest based raffles
conducted by two (2) or more Indiana affiliates of the qualified
organization.
(2) Designate a full-time employee of the qualified organization
as the operator of a raffle or contest based raffle conducted by
an Indiana affiliate of the qualified organization if the employee
is qualified under subsection (a)(2).
SECTION 17. IC 4-32.3-5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2021,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c)
through (e), an operator or a worker may not directly or indirectly
participate, other than in a capacity as an operator or a worker, in an
allowable activity that the operator or worker is conducting.
(b) A patron at a casino game night may deal the cards in a card
game if:
(1) the card game in which the patron deals the cards is a
qualified card game;
(2) the patron deals the cards in the manner required in the
ordinary course of the qualified card game; and
(3) the qualified card game is played under the supervision of the
qualified organization conducting the casino game night in
accordance with section 12 of this chapter (in the case of a game
of Texas hold'em poker or Omaha poker) and any rules adopted
by the commission.
A patron who deals the cards in a qualified card game conducted under
this subsection is not considered a worker or an operator for purposes
of this article.
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


(c) A worker at a festival event may participate as a player in any
gaming activity offered at the festival event except as follows:
(1) A worker may not participate in any game during the time in
which the worker is conducting or helping to conduct the game.
(2) A worker who conducts or helps to conduct a pull tab,
punchboard, or tip board event during a festival event may not
participate as a player in a pull tab, punchboard, or tip board
event conducted on the same calendar day.
(d) A worker at a bingo event:
(1) whose duties are limited to:
(A) selling bingo supplies;
(B) selling tickets for a raffle or contest based raffle
conducted at the bingo event; or
(C) the duties described in both clauses (A) and (B);
(2) who has completed all of the worker's duties before the start
of the first bingo game of the bingo event; and
(3) who is not engaged as a worker at any other time during the
bingo event;
may participate as a player in any gaming activity offered at the bingo
event following the completion of the worker's duties at the bingo
event.
(e) A worker at a raffle or contest based raffle conducted by a
qualified organization may purchase a raffle ticket or contest based
raffle ticket for a particular drawing at the raffle or contest based
raffle, subject to the following restrictions:
(1) The worker may not purchase a raffle ticket or contest based
raffle ticket from himself or herself.
(2) The worker may not participate in the drawing of a winner.
SECTION 18. IC 4-32.3-5-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2021,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c),
and (e), the following persons may not play or participate in any
manner in an allowable activity:
(1) A member or an employee of the commission.
(2) A person less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) A member or employee of the commission may participate in an
allowable activity if that person:
(1) has received written authorization from the executive director
to participate in an allowable activity; and
(2) is participating only to the extent approved by the executive
director.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (b), an employee of the
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


commission or a relative of an employee of the commission living in
the same household with the employee may not be an operator, worker,
or a volunteer ticket taker.
(d) An employee, officer, or owner of a manufacturer or distributor
is prohibited from participating in or affiliating in any way with the
charity gaming operations of a qualified organization that an employee,
officer, or owner is a member.
(e) A person less than eighteen (18) years of age may sell tickets or
chances for a raffle or contest based raffle.
SECTION 19. IC 4-32.3-5-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. The following apply to a qualified
organization's use of a volunteer raffle ticket agent or volunteer
contest based raffle ticket agent:
(1) Before using volunteer ticket agents to sell tickets to an
allowable activity, a qualified organization shall provide a list
containing the following information to the commission:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of each retail
establishment whose employees will serve as volunteer ticket
agents.
(B) The name of the general manager of each retail
establishment listed under clause (A).
(2) A volunteer ticket agent may not sell pull tabs, punchboards,
or tip boards.
(3) A volunteer ticket agent is not required to be a member in
good standing of the qualified organization.
(4) A volunteer ticket agent may participate as a patron in any
allowable activity conducted by the qualified organization.
(5) A qualified organization must include on each ticket or entry
sold by a volunteer ticket agent the name of the qualified
organization, the date of the allowable activity, and a valid license
number for the allowable activity.
(6) All tickets sold by volunteer ticket agents must be numbered
sequentially.
(7) After tickets to the allowable activity are sold, the qualified
organization shall provide to the commission the name, address,
and telephone number of each person who served as a volunteer
ticket agent.
SECTION 20. IC 4-32.3-5-25 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. A contest based raffle must be
conducted as follows:
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92


(1) The number of different ticket numbers available to be
sold in a contest based raffle must be equal to the number of
contestants in the contest or event used to determine the
winners of the contest based raffle.
(2) Tickets for a chance to win a contest based raffle must be
sold in a serial manner so that an approximately equal
number of patrons hold tickets bearing the number of each
contestant.
(3) A patron holding a ticket bearing the number of the
contestant that wins the contest or event is a winner of the
contest based raffle prize.
(4) The contest based raffle prize must be equally divided
among the number of patrons holding a winning ticket.
2026 IN 1407—LS 6383/DI 92